Hawaii statutes.
§142-23 Brucellosis testing; indemnity for
slaughtered cattle. The department of agriculture may institute and
conduct a brucellosis testing program.

The department may pay indemnities to owners of
cattle sent to slaughter as reactors to the brucellosis test. The payment
shall be in the amount of one-third of the difference between the appraised
value of each animal slaughtered and the salvage value thereof to owners of
cattle reacting positively to the brucellosis test and sent to slaughter;
provided that in no case shall this amount exceed $75 per animal; and provided
further that no indemnity shall be paid for steers and spayed heifers. The
department shall prescribe and enforce rules under which the amount of
indemnification shall be ascertained, pursuant to this section.

The amount of indemnification having been thus
ascertained, the owner may present to the state comptroller a claim against the
State therefor. A warrant for the payment of the claim shall be made upon
vouchers approved by the department and supported by the inspector's report.

The department may take such action that it may
deem necessary to further the provisions of this section over any ensuing
fiscal period. [L 1957, c 229, §§1-3; am L 1957, c 152, §1; am L Sp 1959 1st, c
13, §2; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §2; Supp, §20-22.8; HRS
§142-23]

Attorney General Opinions

The term
"cattle" includes goats. Att. Gen. Op. 64-20.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next